Arkansas, session 2025, SB582.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 2, Chapter 33, Subchapter 3, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
2-33-309. State Action Poultry Flock Depopulation Grant Program.
(a) There is established within the Department of Finance and
Administration the State Action Poultry Flock Depopulation Grant Program to
be administered by the Secretary of the Department of Finance and
Administration.
(b) The secretary shall award grants under the program to provide
financial assistance to eligible poultry growers within the state.
(c)(1) A poultry grower whose poultry flock was depopulated by the
state is eligible to receive grant funds under this section.
(2) Subdivision (c)(1) of this section includes without
limitation a poultry grower whose poultry flock was depopulated by the state
prior to the effective date of this act.
(d)(1) The department shall promulgate rules to implement this
section.
(2) The rules promulgated under subdivision (d)(1) of this
section shall include without limitation the process for:
*CRH209*
03/31/2025 10:47:08 AM CRH209

SB582
(A) Submitting documentation to the department showing a
poultry grower's loss due to state-mandated depopulation of the poultry
grower's poultry flock; and
(B) Distribution of grant funds.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Rules.
(a) When adopting the initial rules required under this act, the
Department of Finance and Administration shall file the final rules with the
Secretary of State for adoption under § 25-15-204(f):
(1) On or before January 1, 2026; or
(2) If approval under § 10-3-309 has not occurred by January 1,
2026, as soon as practicable after approval under § 10-3-309.
(b) The department shall file the proposed rules with the Legislative
Council under § 10-3-309(c) sufficiently in advance of January 1, 2026, so
that the Legislative Council may consider the rules for approval before
January 1, 2026.




















03/31/2025 10:47:08 AM CRH209